Hawaii statutes.
[§346-369] Exemptions. (a) Any
compensation received by a provider agency for services rendered to homeless
families or individuals, or in operating or managing a homeless facility
authorized by this part, is exempt from taxation under chapter 237.

(b) Any county mayor may exempt, by executive
order, donors and provider agencies from real property taxes, water and sewer
development fees, rates collected for water supplied to consumers and for use
of sewers, and any other county taxes, charges, or fees; provided that any
county may enact ordinances to regulate the exemptions granted by this
subsection.

(c) Any provider agency operating or managing
a homeless facility or any other program for the homeless authorized by this
part is exempt, for purposes of those facilities or programs, from any
requirements contained in part VIII of chapter 346 and chapters 467 and 521. [L
2010, c 89, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next